District of Columbia statutes.
51-172

Shared work unemployment compensation program.

The Director shall establish a shared work unemployment compensation program as provided by this subchapter. The Director may adopt rules and establish procedures necessary to administer the shared work unemployment compensation program.

History

Oct. 15, 2010, D.C. Law 18-238, § 3, 57 DCR 7181